North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-06.1 Honey

19-06.1-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise indicates:

The terms “honey”, “liquid or extracted honey”, “strained honey”, or “pure honey” are interchangeable and mean the nectar of plants that has been transformed by and is the natural product of the honeybee.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, association, company, corporation, or limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Collateral References.

Liability for injury or damage caused by bees, 86 A.L.R.3d 829.

Keeping bees as nuisance, 88 A.L.R.3d 992.

19-06.1-02.
Prohibited acts.

No person may sell, keep for sale, or offer for sale any product which:

Resembles honey and is labeled as “honey”.

Is not pure honey and is labeled with a picture or drawing of a bee, beehive, or honeycomb.

Contains a mixture of honey and any other ingredient and is labeled as “honey”.

Contains honey and any other ingredient unless the container bears a label which lists the ingredients in their order of predominance. In the ingredients statement, the word “honey” must appear in the same type size as the other ingredients.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 3.

19-06.1-03.
Use of word honey in products not resembling honey.

Products which do not resemble honey but which contain honey as an ingredient may include the word “honey” in the name of the product. The relative position of the word “honey” in the product name must be determined by the predominance of honey as an ingredient.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 4.

19-06.1-04.
Use of word imitation prohibited.

Notwithstanding subsection 3 of section 19-02.1-10, the word “imitation” may not be used in the name of a product which resembles honey regardless of whether or not the product contains honey.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 5.

19-06.1-05.
Enforcement authority. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 2; 1989, ch. 264, § 8; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

19-06.1-05.
Enforcement authority. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 2; 1989, ch. 264, § 8; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 90, effective September 1, 2022.

19-06.1-06.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 196, § 6.